Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1460
Warrantor; dealer obligations; schedule of compensation.

A warrantor shall:

(1) Specify a dealer's obligations, if any, for preparation, delivery, and consumer care on products that are under warranty by the warrantor. Any such obligations shall be specified in writing;

(2) Compensate a dealer for consumer care that is (a) performed by such dealer and (b) covered by a warranty issued by the warrantor;

(3) Create a schedule of compensation and provide such schedule to each dealer that is authorized by the warrantor to perform warranty service; and

(4) Whenever the warrantor modifies a schedule of compensation, provide such updated schedule of compensation to each dealer that is authorized by the warrantor to perform warranty service.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 19.
October 1, 2026